North Dakota, session 69, SB2221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 15-10-38.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The requirement under subdivision c of subsection 4 is met if an individual is enrolled in or has
completed a master of science degree in nursing while teaching four clinical credits per year
and resides and works in this state in an occupation requiring the degree.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 15-10-38.2 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. The state board of higher education and the workforce development council shall compile a
list of qualifying educational programs annually. A qualifying educational program is:
a. Is a program resulting in attainment of an associate's degree or lower credential program
that may be completed within four semesters, six quarters, or the final two years of a
baccalaureate program. A qualifying educational program also must
b. Must pertain to the professional and technical skills and emerging occupations in high
demand in this state, as determined under subsection 3. Qualifying educational programs
may
c. May include degree or certificate programs.
d. Notwithstanding any other requirements under this subsection, is a program resulting in
attainment of a master of science degree in nursing, if the individual teaches four clinical
credits per calendar year.

S. B. NO. 2221 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2221.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State